Washington statutes.
RCW 43.15.090

Legislative committee on economic development and international relations—Cooperation with committees, agencies, and councils.

The legislative committee on economic development and international relations shall cooperate, act, and function with legislative committees, executive agencies, and with the councils or committees of other states and of provinces and territories of Canada similar to this committee, and with other interstate research organizations.

[ 2024 c 336 s 9; 1985 c 467 s 23. Formerly RCW 44.52.070.]